Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
RESIGNATION AND TERMINATION

7-126-301. Resignation.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, a member may resign at any time.

The resignation of a member does not relieve the member from any obligations the member may have to the nonprofit corporation as a result of obligations incurred or commitments made prior to resignation.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 672, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-126-302. Termination, expulsion, or suspension.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, no member of a nonprofit corporation may be expelled or suspended, and no membership or memberships in such nonprofit corporation may be terminated or suspended except pursuant to a procedure that is fair and reasonable and is carried out in good faith.

For purposes of this section, a procedure is fair and reasonable when either:

The bylaws or a written policy of the board of directors state a procedure that provides:

Not less than fifteen days prior written notice of the expulsion, suspension, or termination and the reasons therefor; and

An opportunity for the member to be heard, orally or in writing, not less than five days before the effective date of the expulsion, suspension, or termination by a person or persons authorized to decide that the proposed expulsion, termination, or suspension not take place; or

It is fair and reasonable taking into consideration all of the relevant facts and circumstances.

For purposes of this section, any written notice given by mail must be given by first-class or certified mail sent to the last address of the member shown on the nonprofit corporation's records.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, any proceeding challenging an expulsion, suspension, or termination, including a proceeding in which defective notice is alleged, must be commenced within one year after the effective date of the expulsion, suspension, or termination.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, a member who has been expelled or suspended may be liable to the nonprofit corporation for dues, assessments, or fees as a result of obligations incurred or commitments made prior to expulsion or suspension.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 672, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

IP(2)(a) amended, p. 2337, § 290, effective July 1, 2004.

7-126-303. Purchase of memberships.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, a nonprofit corporation shall not purchase the membership of a member who resigns or whose membership is terminated. If so authorized, a nonprofit corporation may purchase the membership of a member who resigns or whose membership is terminated for the amount and pursuant to the conditions stated in or authorized by its bylaws. No payment shall be made in violation of article 133 of this title.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 673, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2338, § 291, effective July 1, 2004.

7-126-304. Residential membership - return of consideration - cessation of periodic payments - time limits - effective date.

Notwithstanding any provision of the articles of incorporation or bylaws to the contrary:

A residential nonprofit corporation shall refund the entrance fee of a residential member to the member or his or her heirs within ninety days after a transfer of the residential membership.

This paragraph (a) applies only to contracts entered into on or after March 11, 2011.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2012.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2012.)

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1110), ch. 22, p. 55, § 2, effective March 11; (1)(a) amended, (HB 11-1324), ch. 268, p. 1222, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (SB 12-024), ch. 39, p. 137, § 1, effective March 22.